California statutes. Welfare and Institutions Code
Powers and Duties of the Committee

(a) (1) The committee is advisory only and does not possess decisionmaking authority. The committee is established for the sole purpose of researching and analyzing approaches and best practices for the development and implementation of the components of this chapter, including by preparing reports or recommendations and providing advice thereon for submission to the department. The department has sole and final decisionmaking authority under this chapter.

(2) The committee shall advise and make written recommendations to the department with respect to implementing this chapter and achieving the objectives set forth in Sections 14199.101
 and 14199.102.

(b) The committee is authorized, but not limited, to do any of the following:

(1) Undertake investigations or studies.

(2) Issue written reports.

(3) Post any report or recommendation on the department’s internet website under the committee’s own link on the internet website.

(c) Any member of the committee may request, and the Controller and department shall provide, any written accounting or record of deposits into, transfers between, or expenditures out of, any fund, subfund, account, or subaccount established or created by this chapter.

(d) The committee may establish subcommittees consisting of one or more
 of its members, and may delegate to a subcommittee any right or responsibility bestowed upon the committee, including the right or responsibility of providing advice and written input to the department on a given subject.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.133.

Compensation

Members of the committee shall serve without compensation, but shall receive reimbursement for necessary expenses, subject to approval by the department.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Amendments, Construction, Standing  [14199.134. - 14199.136.]

14199.134.

Amendment of Chapter

(a) The Legislature may amend this chapter by a statute passed in each house of the Legislature by rollcall vote entered into the journal, three-fourths of the membership concurring, provided that the statute is consistent with, and furthers the purpose of, this chapter.

(b) A bill seeking to amend this chapter after the effective date of this chapter shall not be passed or ultimately become a statute unless the bill has been printed and distributed to members, and published on the Internet, in its final form, for at least 10 business days before its passage in either house of the Legislature.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.135.

Construction of Chapter

(a) Severability. The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, subclause, sentence, phrase, word, or application of this chapter is for any reason held to be invalid by a decision of any court of competent jurisdiction, that decision shall not affect the validity of the remaining portions of this chapter. The people of the State of California hereby declare that they would have adopted this chapter and each and every portion, section, subdivision, paragraph, subparagraph, clause, subclause, sentence, phrase, word, and application not declared invalid or unconstitutional without regard to whether any part of this chapter or application thereof would be subsequently
 declared invalid.

(b) Liberal Construction. This chapter is an exercise of the initiative power of the people of the State of California pursuant to Article II and Article IV of the Constitution, and shall be liberally construed to effectuate the purposes set forth in this chapter.

(c) Statutory References. Unless otherwise stated, all references contained in this chapter to statutes codified outside of this chapter refer to those statutes as they existed on July 1, 2023.

(d) Effective Date. This chapter shall take effect on the next January 1 following its approval by the voters of California.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.)
-------------------------------------------

14199.136.

Standing to Defend Chapter

Notwithstanding any other law, if the State of California or any of its officers or officials fail to defend the constitutionality of this chapter, following its approval by the voters, any other state or local government agency of this state shall have the authority to intervene on behalf of the State of California or the department in a court action challenging the constitutionality of this chapter for the purpose of defending its constitutionality, whether that action is in state or federal trial court, on appeal, or on discretionary review by the Supreme Court of California or the Supreme Court of the United States. The reasonable fees and costs of defending the action by the other state or local government agency shall be a charge on funds
 appropriated to the Department of Justice, which shall be satisfied promptly.

(History: Added November 5, 2024, by initiative Proposition 35, Sec. 1.   Effective December 18, 2024.   Approved in Proposition 35 at the November 5, 2024, election.   Operative January 1, 2025, pursuant to Section 14199.135.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Prepaid Plans [14200. - 14499.77.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14200. - 14206.]

14200.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Waxman-Duffy Prepaid Health Plan Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------

14200.1.

The purpose of this chapter is to afford persons eligible to receive benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part the opportunity to enroll as regular subscribers in prepaid health plans, without reference to marital status or any characteristic listed or defined in Section 11135 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 682, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14201.

The intent of the Legislature is to provide, to the extent feasible, through the provisions of this chapter and the necessarily related provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part, recipients of public assistance and medically indigent aged and other persons with the opportunity to enroll in prepaid health plans. It is further intended that this legislation is to benefit the people of the State of California by:

(a) Encouraging the development of more efficient delivery of health care to Medi-Cal recipients.

(b) Reducing the inflationary costs of health care.

(c) Improving the quality of medical services rendered to those eligible enrollees as defined in this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part.

(d) Reducing administrative costs of operating the Medi-Cal Act by allowing prepaid health plans to assume substantial costs of administration and utilization controls that are now assumed by the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14203.

(a) For purposes of administering this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part, the department is hereby designated as the single or appropriate state agency with full power to administer and adopt regulations in order to secure full compliance with applicable provisions of state and federal laws.

(b) The department may adopt regulations implementing this chapter as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code. Initial regulations to implement this chapter may be adopted as emergency regulations. The adoption of these initial emergency regulations shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law as necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health, and safety, or general welfare. Initial emergency regulations adopted pursuant to this section shall remain in effect for no more than 180 days.

(c) This section shall become operative on January 1, 1995.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 5) and added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 573, Sec. 6.   Effective September 28, 1993.   Section operative January 1, 1995, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

14204.

(a) Pursuant to the provisions of this chapter, the department may contract with one or more prepaid health plans in order to provide the benefits authorized under this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part. The department may contract with one or more children’s hospitals on an exclusive basis for a specified population in a specified geographic area. Contracts entered into pursuant to this chapter may be awarded on a bid or nonbid basis.

(b) In order to achieve maximum cost savings the Legislature hereby determines that expedited contract process for contracts under this chapter is necessary. Therefore, contracts under this chapter shall be exempt from
 Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 10290) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(c) The department shall amend contracts with dental health plans in effect on the date the act that added this subdivision and Section 14459.6 become effective to provide Medi-Cal dental services authorized under this chapter and Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) to Medi-Cal beneficiaries who reside in a specified geographic area to meet the requirements of Sections 14089.09 and 14459.6.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 23, Sec. 112.   (AB 1467)   Effective June 27, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14205.

Except where the context otherwise requires, or where specific exceptions are authorized, all provisions of Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part shall be applicable to the provisions of this chapter and the violation of the provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto shall be deemed to be a violation of Chapter 7.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14206.

(a) No prepaid health plan or pilot program shall be deemed to transact insurance or to be subject to any provision of the Insurance Code by virtue of negotiating, executing, or performing a prepaid health plan or pilot program contract under this chapter, or by virtue of compliance with the provisions of such a prepaid health plan or pilot program contract, including, but not limited to, creation, segregation, or maintenance of security to protect or safeguard the performance of such a prepaid health plan or pilot program contract. The director may require such security in respect to any such contract including, but not limited to, securities, surety bonds, or evidences of governmental debt, of the kinds, in the manner, and to the extent provided by the prepaid health plan or pilot program contract.

(b) Prepaid health plans or pilot programs to which the state is a party under the provisions of this chapter, and contracts and arrangements embodying such plans or programs shall not be subject to the provisions of law prescribing the forms of hospital or medical service or insurance contracts or requiring approval thereof or of the form thereof, by any state officer or agency except the director or the department.

This exemption applies, but is not limited to: (1) Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 10270) of Part 2 of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, (2) Section 11069 of the Insurance Code, and (3) Section 11513 of the Insurance Code. However, the exemption provided for in this section shall not exempt any insurer subject to taxation under Part 7 (commencing with Section 12001) of Division 2 of the Revenue and Taxation Code from the tax imposed under such part on gross premiums derived from contracts under this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Definitions [14250. - 14265.]

14250.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions set forth in this article govern the construction of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------

14251.

(a) (1) “Prepaid health plan” means a plan that meets all of the following criteria:

(A) Is licensed as a health care service plan by the Director of the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), other than a plan organized and operating pursuant to Section 10810 of the Corporations Code that substantially indemnifies subscribers or enrollees for the cost of provided services, or has an application for licensure pending and was registered under the Knox-Mills Health Plan Act prior to its repeal.

(B) Meets the requirements for participation in the Medicaid program (Title XIX of the Social Security Act) on an at-risk basis.

(C) Agrees with the State Department of Health Care Services to furnish directly or indirectly health services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries on a predetermined periodic rate basis.

(2) “Prepaid health plan” includes any organization that is licensed as a plan pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 and is subject to regulation by the Department of Managed Health Care pursuant to that act, and that contracts with the State Department of Health Care Services solely as a fiscal intermediary at risk.

(b) (1) Except for the requirement of licensure pursuant to the Knox-Keene Health Care
 Service Plan Act of 1975, the State Director of Health Care Services may waive any provision of this chapter that the director determines is inappropriate for a fiscal intermediary at risk. An exemption or waiver shall be set forth in the fiscal intermediary at-risk contract with the State Department of Health Care Services.

(2) “Fiscal intermediary at risk” means any entity that entered into a contract with the State Department of Health Care Services on a pilot basis pursuant to subdivision (f) of Section 14000, as in effect June 1, 1973, in accordance with which the entity received capitated payments from the state and reimbursed providers of health care services on a fee-for-service or other basis for at least the basic scope of health care services, as defined in Section 14256, provided to all beneficiaries covered by the contract residing within a specified geographic region of the state. The fiscal intermediary at risk shall be at risk
 for the cost of administration and utilization of services or the cost of services, or both, for at least the basic scope of health care services, as defined in Section 14256, provided to all beneficiaries covered by the contract residing within a specified geographic region of the state. The fiscal intermediary at risk may share the risk with providers or reinsuring agencies or both. Eligibility of beneficiaries shall be determined by the State Department of Health Care Services and capitation payments shall be based on the number of beneficiaries so determined.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2015, Ch. 455, Sec. 53.   (SB 804)   Effective January 1, 2016.)
-------------------------------------------

14252.

“Medi-Cal beneficiary” means a person who is eligible to receive benefits under Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000) of this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 1972, Ch. 1366.)
-------------------------------------------

14253.

“Subcontract” means an agreement entered into by the prepaid health plan with any of the following:

(a) A provider of health care services who agrees to furnish such services to Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in the prepaid health plan.

(b) A marketing organization.

(c) Any other person or organization who agrees to perform any administrative function or service for the operation of the prepaid health plan specifically related to securing or fulfilling its contractual obligations with the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14254.

(a) “Primary care physician” is a physician who has the responsibility for providing initial and primary care to patients, for maintaining the continuity of patient care, and for initiating referral for specialist care. A primary care physician shall be either a physician who has limited his or her practice of medicine to general practice or who is a board-certified or board-eligible internist, pediatrician, obstetrician-gynecologist, or family practitioner.

(b) A nonphysician medical practitioner, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 14088, who is supervised by a primary care physician, has the responsibility for providing initial and primary care to patients, for maintaining
 the continuity of patient care, and for initiating referral for specialist care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2013, Ch. 684, Sec. 5.   (SB 494)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

14255.

“Specialist” means a physician who is board certified or board eligible in the specialty of medical care provided.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14256.

The “basic scope of health care benefits” means:

(a) Physician’s services;

(b) Hospital outpatient services;

(c) Laboratory and X-ray;

(d) Prescription drugs;

(e) Hospital inpatient care;

(f) Skilled nursing facility care.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 1240.)
-------------------------------------------

14257.

Nothing in this act shall preclude the director from contracting with licensed specialized health care service plans which provide only dental, pharmaceutical, optometric, or psychological services in accordance with regulations issued by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14258.

“Service area” means a geographical area designated by the department within which a prepaid health plan shall provide health care services and within which the Medi-Cal beneficiaries eligible for enrollment in the prepaid health plan reside.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------

14259.

“Director” means the State Director of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14260.

“Department” means the State Department of Health Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1252.)
-------------------------------------------

14261.

“Vendor” means any person who provides services or supplies to a prepaid health plan or a subcontractor of a prepaid health plan and who does not have a subcontract as defined by Section 14253 with either the prepaid health plan or its subcontractors.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14263.

“Marketing” means any activity conducted by or on behalf of a prepaid health plan where information regarding the services offered by a prepaid health plan is disseminated in order to persuade Medi-Cal beneficiaries to enroll or accept any application for enrollment in the prepaid health plan. Marketing shall also include any similar activity to procure the endorsement of the prepaid health plan from any individual or organization.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14264.

“Marketing organization” means any subcontractor who agrees to provide marketing services for a prepaid health plan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1977, Ch. 1036.)
-------------------------------------------

14265.

“Marketing representative” means any person who engages in marketing activities on behalf of a marketing organization or the prepaid health plan.

(History: Added by Stats. 1974, Ch. 983.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Administration [14300. - 14316.]

14300.

The department shall publish a notice of intent to contract at least 60 days prior to the effective date of any initial or renewed contract. The notice shall appear in local newspapers circulated in the service areas of the prepaid health plan. The notice shall announce the department’s intent to contract and any person affected by the contract shall have the opportunity to request that a public hearing be held. The request for public hearing shall be accompanied by an explanation of the reason for the request and a description of problems or questions regarding the plan’s ability to meet its contractual obligations. A hearing shall be held by the department if the director determines that the request is reasonable and warrants a full public hearing. A request shall be considered reasonable if there is a question regarding the plan’s ability to meet its contractual obligations.

No contract shall be signed by the department until the department determines that the plan has the ability to fully comply with its contractual obligations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1984, Ch. 1338, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.

(a) The department shall determine, by actuarial methods, prospective per capita rates of payment for services provided under this chapter for Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in a prepaid health plan. The rates of payment shall be determined annually, shall be effective no later than either the first day of July each year, or another date chosen by the department, and shall not exceed the total per capita amount (including cost of administration) which the department estimates (with appropriate adjustments to provide actuarial equivalence) would be payable for all services and requirements covered under the prepaid health plan contract if all such services and requirements were to be furnished to Medi-Cal beneficiaries under the fee-for-service Medi-Cal program provided for by Chapter 7 (commencing with Section 14000).

In the event that there is any delay in the payment of the new annual rates determined pursuant to this subdivision, continued payment to the prepaid health plan of the rate in effect at the time the delay occurred shall be interim payment only, and shall be subject to increase or decrease, as the case may be, to the level of the new annual rates effective as of either the first day of July or the date chosen by the department.

Notwithstanding the foregoing provision, in the event that a contract amendment providing for the new annual rates has been executed by the department and a prepaid health plan, but has not yet received the approval of all required control agencies and departments by the end of the first month following the effective date of the new rate, payment of the new annual rates shall commence no later than the first day of the second month following the effective date of the new rate. Contract amendments providing for the new annual rates shall provide that the prepaid health plan contractor agrees that by accepting payment of the new annual rates prior to final approval, such contractor stipulates to a confession of judgment for any amounts received in excess of the final approved rate. If the final approved rates differ from the rates set forth in such amendments, any underpayment by the state shall be paid by the department to the prepaid health plan within 30 days after final approval of such rates. Any overpayment by the state shall be recaptured by the state withholding the amount due from the prepaid health plan’s next capitation check. If the amount to be withheld from subsequent capitation checks exceeds 25 percent of the appropriate capitation payment for that month, amounts up to 25 percent shall be withheld from each successive monthly capitation payment until such deficiencies are recovered by the state.

The contract shall provide the specific per capita rates, to be determined by sound actuarial methods on the basis of age, sex, and aid categories, which the state shall pay the prepaid health plan each month for each beneficiary enrolled in the prepaid health plan, a detailed description of the specific actuarial method or methods and assumptions used in determining per capita rates, and a summary of the data base, including costs and inflation assumptions and utilization rates, which was used to determine per capita rates. In addition, the director shall engage and rely upon the services of an actuary or consulting actuary in determining prospective per capita rates.

(b) Any prepaid health plan with an operating experience and scale of operation deemed by the department to be insufficient to justify the application of an actuarially determined per capita rate, shall be reimbursed on a cost basis up to the fee-for-service maximum for services provided until such time as the director determines that a per capita method is reasonable, but not to exceed a period of one year. For purposes of this section, costs shall be net of intercompany profits in those circumstances where any of the following persons have a substantial financial interest, as defined by Section 14478, in any vendor to the prepaid health plan or any vendor to a subcontractor of the plan:

(1) Any person also having a substantial financial interest in the plan.

(2) Any director, officer, partner, trustee or employee of the plan.

(3) Any member of the immediate family of any person designated in paragraph (1) or (2).

(c) The obligations of a prepaid health plan shall be changed only by contract or contract amendment. Any such change may be made during a contract term or at the time of contract renewal, where there is a change in obligations required by federal or state law or regulation, or required by a change in the interpretation or implementation of any such law or regulation. If any such change in obligations occurs which affects the cost to a prepaid health plan of performing under the terms of its contract, then the per capita rates under the contract may be redetermined in the manner provided by subdivision (a) to reflect such change. During such period of time as is required to redetermine the per capita rates, payment to a prepaid health plan of the per capita rates in effect at the time such change occurred shall be considered interim payments and shall be subject to increase or decrease, as the case may be, effective as of the date on which such change is effective.

(d) The obligations of a prepaid health plan shall be changed only by contract or contract amendment wherein payment for the changes, whether payment results in an increase or decrease in the prior per capita rates paid to a prepaid health plan, shall be determined in accordance with this section and paid to affected prepaid health plans.

(e) Nothing contained in this section shall be construed as removing from a prepaid health plan the risk of beneficial or adverse effects, including inflation, which normally result from contracting to furnish health services.

(f) Per capita rates of payment for services provided to Medi-Cal beneficiaries enrolled in prepaid health plans or Medi-Cal managed care plans contracting in areas specified by the director for expansion of the Medi-Cal managed care program under Section 14087.3 or contracting under Sections 14018.7, 14087.31, 14087.35, 14087.36, 14087.38, 14087.96, 14089, and 14089.05 shall be paid by the state effective the date a beneficiary’s enrollment takes effect. A primary care provider or clinic contracting with a prepaid health plan or a Medi-Cal managed care plan on a capitation basis and whose assignment to or selection by a beneficiary has been confirmed by the plan shall be paid capitation payments effective the date of the beneficiary’s enrollment. However, a primary care provider whose assignment to or selection by a beneficiary was not confirmed by the plan on the date of the beneficiary’s enrollment, but is later confirmed by the plan, shall be paid capitation payments effective no later than 30 days after the beneficiary’s enrollment. The prepaid health plan or Medi-Cal managed care plan shall be financially responsible for all Medi-Cal services covered under the contract with the department for any newly enrolled beneficiary until that beneficiary has a confirmed assignment to a primary care provider or clinic. This subdivision shall not apply when a beneficiary requests a change in primary care provider after initial selection or assignment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1995, Ch. 859, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 1996.)
-------------------------------------------

14301.1.

(a) For rates established on or after August 1, 2007, the department shall pay capitation rates to health plans participating in the Medi-Cal managed care program using actuarial methods and may establish health-plan- and county-specific rates. Notwithstanding any other law, this section shall apply to any managed care organization, licensed under the Knox-Keene Health Care Service Plan Act of 1975 (Chapter 2.2 (commencing with Section 1340) of Division 2 of the Health and Safety Code), that has contracted with the department as a primary care case management plan pursuant to Article 2.9 (commencing with Section 14088) of Chapter 7 to provide services to beneficiaries who are HIV positive or who have been diagnosed with AIDS for rates
 established on or after July 1, 2012. The department shall utilize a county- and model-specific rate methodology to develop Medi-Cal managed care capitation rates for contracts entered into between the department and any entity pursuant to Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 14087.3), Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5), and Article 2.91 (commencing with Section 14089) of Chapter 7 that includes, but is not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Health-plan-specific encounter and claims data.

(2) Supplemental utilization and cost data submitted by the health plans.

(3) Fee-for-service data for the underlying county of operation or other appropriate counties as deemed necessary by the department.

(4) Department of Managed Health Care financial statement data specific to Medi-Cal operations.

(5) Other demographic factors, such as age, gender, or diagnostic-based risk adjustments, as the department deems appropriate.

(b) To the extent that the department is unable to obtain sufficient actual plan data, it may substitute plan model, similar plan, or county-specific fee-for-service data.

(c) The department shall develop rates that include administrative costs, and may apply different administrative costs with respect to separate aid code groups.

(d) The department shall develop rates that
 shall include, but are not limited to, assumptions for underwriting, return on investment, risk, contingencies, changes in policy, and a detailed review of health plan financial statements to validate and reconcile costs for use in developing rates.

(e) The department may develop rates that pay plans based on performance incentives, including quality indicators, access to care, and data submission.

(f) The department may develop and adopt condition-specific payment rates for health conditions, including, but not limited to, childbirth delivery.

(g) (1) Before finalizing Medi-Cal managed care capitation rates, the department shall provide health plans with information on how the rates were
 developed, including rate sheets for that specific health plan, and provide the plans with the opportunity to provide additional supplemental information.

(2) For contracts entered into between the department and any entity pursuant to Article 2.8 (commencing with Section 14087.5) of Chapter 7, the department, by June 30 of each year, or, if the budget has not passed by that date, no later than five working days after the budget is signed, shall provide preliminary rates for the upcoming fiscal year.

(h) For the purposes of developing capitation rates through implementation of this ratesetting methodology, Medi-Cal managed care health plans shall provide the department with financial and utilization data in a form and substance as deemed necessary by the department to establish
 rates. These data shall be considered proprietary and shall be exempt from disclosure as official information pursuant to Section 7927.705 of the Government Code as contained in the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code).

(i) Notwithstanding any other law, on and after the effective date of the act adding this subdivision, the department may apply this section to the capitation rates it pays under any managed care health plan contract.

(j) Notwithstanding Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code, the department may set and implement managed care capitation rates, and interpret or make specific this section and any applicable federal
 waivers and state plan amendments by means of plan letters, plan or provider bulletins, or similar instructions, without taking regulatory action.

(k) (1) The department shall report, upon request, to the fiscal and policy committees of the respective houses of the Legislature regarding implementation of this section.

(2) The department shall publish on its public internet website a description of the rate methodology, data used for rate development, and core actuarial assumptions and adjustments in each year that the department develops rates pursuant to this section.

(l) Before October 1, 2011, the risk-adjusted countywide capitation rate shall comprise no more than 20 percent of the total capitation
 rate paid to each Medi-Cal managed care plan.

(m) (1) It is the intent of the Legislature to preserve the policy goal to support and strengthen traditional safety net providers who treat high volumes of uninsured and Medi-Cal patients when Medi-Cal enrollees are defaulted into Medi-Cal managed care plans.

(2) As the department adds additional factors, such as managed care plan costs, to the Medi-Cal managed care plan default assignment algorithm, it shall consult with the Auto Assignment Performance Incentive Program stakeholder workgroup to develop cost factor disregards related to intergovernmental transfers and required wraparound payments that support safety net providers.

(n) (1) The department shall develop and pay capitation rates to entities contracted pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591), using actuarial methods and in a manner consistent with this section, except as provided in this subdivision.

(2) (A) The department may develop capitation rates using a standardized rate methodology across managed care plan models
 for comparable populations. The specific rate methodology applied to PACE organizations shall address features of PACE that distinguishes it from other managed care plan models.

(B) The rate methodology shall be consistent with actuarial rate development principles and shall provide for all reasonable, appropriate, and attainable costs for each PACE organization within a region.

(3) The department may develop statewide rates and apply geographic adjustments, using available data sources deemed appropriate by the department. Consistent with actuarial methods, the primary source of data used to develop rates for each PACE organization shall be its Medi-Cal cost and utilization data or other data sources as deemed necessary by the department.

(4) Rates developed pursuant to this subdivision shall reflect the level of care associated with the specific populations served under the contract.

(5) The rate methodology developed pursuant to this subdivision shall contain a mechanism to account for the costs of high-cost drugs and treatments.

(6) Rates developed pursuant to this subdivision shall be actuarially certified before implementation.

(7) The department shall consult with those entities contracted pursuant to Chapter 8.75 (commencing with Section 14591) in developing a rate methodology according to this subdivision.

(8) Consistent
 with the requirements of federal law, the department shall calculate an upper payment limit for payments to PACE organizations. In calculating the upper payment limit, the department shall correct the applicable data as necessary and
 shall consider the risk of nursing home placement for the comparable population when estimating the level of care and risk of PACE participants.

(9) The department shall pay the entity at a rate within the certified actuarially sound rate range developed with respect to that entity, to the extent consistent with federal requirements and subject to paragraph (11), as necessary to mitigate the impact to the entity of the methodology developed pursuant to this subdivision.

(10) During the first two years in which a new PACE organization or existing PACE organization enters a previously unserved area, the department shall pay at a rate within the certified actuarially sound rate range developed with respect to that entity, to the extent consistent with federal
 requirements and subject to paragraph (11), to reflect the lower enrollment and higher operating costs associated with a new PACE organization relative to a PACE organization with higher enrollment and more experience providing managed care interventions to its beneficiaries.

(11) This subdivision shall be implemented only to the extent that any necessary federal approvals are obtained and federal financial participation is available.

(12) This subdivision shall apply for rates implemented no earlier than January 1, 2017.

(o) (1) Notwithstanding any other law, as a component of the CalAIM Initiative authorized pursuant to Article 5.51 (commencing with Section 14184.100) of Chapter 7, and any successor
 waiver, demonstration, or state plan amendment authorizing the Medi-Cal managed care program, the department may establish capitation rates to contracted health plans on a regional basis in lieu of health plan and county-specific rates.

(2) Before initially implementing regional-based capitation rates under this subdivision, the department shall report to the Legislature on the process for developing those regional rates and determining the regional groups.

(3) The department shall provide a briefing to providers and stakeholders, including, but not limited to, physicians, hospitals, and consumer advocates, that describes the actuarial assumptions and rate methodologies used by the department following submission of rates to the federal government for approval that initially
 implement regional-based capitation rates under this subdivision. This publicly noticed meeting to providers and other stakeholders shall occur no more than 60 days after submission of the capitation rates to the federal government for approval. The meeting shall be for explanatory purposes and shall not otherwise
 impact the methodology and data provided to the federal government for approval.
